Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 1 General Provisions

47-25-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Average final monthly compensation” means the average monthly earnable compensation of any employee during his or her highest 24 months of creditable service.

“Board” means the Board of Commissioners of the Magistrates Retirement Fund of Georgia.

Reserved.

“Fund” means the Magistrates Retirement Fund of Georgia.

“Member” means a member of the Magistrates Retirement Fund of Georgia.

“Secretary-treasurer” means the secretary-treasurer of the Board of Commissioners of the Magistrates Retirement Fund of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2014, p. 835, § 1/HB 646.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Reserved” for the former provisions of paragraph (3), which read: “ ‘Full-time chief magistrate’ means a chief magistrate who regularly exercises the powers of a magistrate as set forth in Code Section 15-10-2 at least 40 hours per workweek.”